Hawaii statutes.
§607-8 Fees of sheriff, deputy sheriff,
police officer, serving or levying officer, or independent civil process
server. [Repeal and reenactment on June 30, 2020. L 2015, c 101, §4.]
(a) For all necessary travel in making the service, per mile for every mile
more than one... 60 cents provided that:

(1) No allowance shall be made where the serving
individual uses a conveyance furnished the serving individual by the State, or
any political or municipal subdivision thereof;

(2) Where the serving individual
serves more than one person in the course of one trip, the serving individual
shall not charge, in the aggregate for all services more than the mileage for
the entire trip; and

(3) As far as practicable, in order to minimize the
mileage fees for the service, the sheriff or chief of police of the serving
police officers, or independent civil process server from the department of
public safety's list under section 353C-10 shall cause the process to be
transmitted to the sheriff, deputy sheriff, the chief of police, a police
officer, or an independent civil process server upon the island of service who
shall make the service upon receipt of the process; and the service shall be
valid, notwithstanding that the process may not be addressed to the individual
actually making the service or to the individual's superior.

For serving criminal summons or any other
criminal process except a subpoena, for each person served therewith....................
$30 effective July 1, 2001. Service of criminal summons or any other criminal
process shall be made only by persons authorized to serve criminal summons.

For serving civil
summons, subpoena, subpoena duces tecum, or any other civil process, except a
garnishee summons, for each person served therewith.............. $43
effective July 1, 2015.

For serving:
garnishee summons, for each person....................... $30 effective July 1,
2015.

For returning as unserved after due and
diligent search any process when it has been found that the person to be served
has left the State ................ $10 effective July 1, 2015.

For serving any
execution or other process for the collection of money, for every dollar
collected up to $10,000................................... 5 cents.

And for every
dollar over $10,000 ... 2-1/2 cents.

All fees paid to any printer for publishing an
advertisement of the sale of any property.

For every bill of
sale.................... $4.

For executing and
acknowledging a deed pursuant to a sale of real estate to be paid by the
grantee in the deed........................................... $10.

For drawing any
bond required by law....... $4.

For serving writ of
possession or restitution, putting any person entitled into the possession of
premises, and removing a tenant pursuant to order of court.........................................
$40.

Together with all necessary expenses incurred
by the individual serving the writ, incident to the eviction.

For selling any property on an order from the
court other than an execution, the same allowance as for service and sales by
execution.

The fees for service of executions,
attachments, and collection of judgments, together with all costs incurred
after judgment rendered, not included in the judgment, in all courts of the
State, shall be collected in addition to the sum directed to be levied and
collected in the writ.

In lieu of any fee under this subsection, the
fee may be an hourly rate of not less than $50 per hour agreed upon in advance
between the party requesting the service and the sheriff, deputy sheriff,
police officer, or independent civil process server performing the service.

(b) Notwithstanding anything in this section
or any other law to the contrary, when any process or subpoena is served by a
subordinate of the sheriff or chief of police, it shall be illegal for the
sheriff or chief of police:

(1) If and so long as the sheriff or chief of police
is being paid a salary by the State or the county, to receive or collect from
the subordinate any portion of the fees, mileage, or other expenses collected
by the subordinate; or

(2) If and so long as the sheriff or chief of police
is not being paid any salary, to collect or receive from the subordinate more
than ten per cent of the fees accruing from the service, or any portion of the
mileage or other expenses collected by the subordinate.

Where a subpoena is served in behalf of the State or
any county by a nonsalaried subordinate of the sheriff or chief of police, the
regular fee for the service shall be payable to the subordinate. Nothing in
this section shall be deemed to prohibit the police commission of any county
from requiring that all fees, mileage, and expenses be paid into a police
benefit fund. [RL 1935, pt of §3791; am L 1939, c 19, pt of §1; RL 1945, §9748;
am L 1949, c 387, §2; RL 1955, §219-8; am L 1963, c 85, §3; HRS §607-8; am L
1968, c 61, §3; am L 1969, c 23, §2; am L 1972, c 88, §5(m); am L 1973, c 55,
§2; am L 1974, c 149, §2; am L 1975, c 112, §2; am L 1978, c 127, §2; am L
1979, c 111, §5(4); am L 1980, c 96, §2; am L 1984, c 52, §2; gen ch 1985; am L
1989, c 211, §10; am L 1990, c 58, §2 and c 281, §11; am L 2001, c 214, §3; am
L 2012, c 142, §4; am L 2013, c 116, §§6, 25(5); am L 2015, c 125, §2; am L
2016, c 55, §21]

Note

The L 2015, c 125 amendment is exempt from the repeal and
reenactment condition of L 2013, c 116, §25. L 2015, c 125, §5.

Case Notes

Cited: 34 H. 363, 375 (1937).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next